apertium-ca-it/apertium-ca-it.ca.dix
    <pardef n="confo/ndre__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndríem</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndria</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndríeu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndries</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndrien</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndria</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndrem</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndré</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndreu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndràs</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndran</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndrà</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>nguéssim</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ngués</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>nguéssiu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>nguessis</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>nguessin</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ngués</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nent</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nent</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>nguérem</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>nguí</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>nguéreu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ngueres</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ngueren</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ngué</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nguem</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nguem</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>neu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>neu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>nguin</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e  v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nguen</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nguin</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nguen</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>ngui</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nga</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>ngui</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nga</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndre</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ndre</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>níem</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nia</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>níeu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nies</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nien</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nia</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>nguéssim</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nguérem</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>ngués</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nguera</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>nguéssiu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>nguéreu</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>nguessis</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ngueres</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>nguessin</l> 
        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ngueren</l> 

<e lm="confondre"><i>confo</i><par n="confo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="difondre"><i>difo</i><par n="confo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="romandre"><i>roma</i><par n="confo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refondre" a="prompsit2adn"><i>refo</i><par n="confo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="infondre"><i>info</i><par n="confo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
